Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 2. General Provisions.

§ 64.2-102.
Meaning of child and related terms.

If, for purposes of this title or for determining rights in and to property pursuant to any deed, will, trust or other instrument, a relationship of parent and child must be established to determine succession or a taking by, through, or from a person:

An adopted person is the child of an adopting parent and not of the biological parents, except that adoption of a child by the spouse of a biological parent has no effect on the relationship between the child and either biological parent.

The parentage of a child resulting from assisted conception is determined as provided in Chapter 9 (§

20-156

et seq.) of Title 20.

Except as otherwise provided by subdivision 1 or 2, a person born out of wedlock is a child of the mother. That person is also a child of the father, if:

The biological parents participated in a marriage ceremony before or after the birth of the child, even though the attempted marriage was prohibited by law, deemed null or void, or dissolved by a court; or

Paternity is established by clear and convincing evidence, including scientifically reliable genetic testing, as set forth in §

64.2-103

; however, paternity established pursuant to this subdivision is ineffective to qualify the father or his kindred to inherit from or through the child unless the father has openly treated the child as his and has not refused to support the child.

No claim of succession based upon the relationship between a child born out of wedlock and a deceased parent of such child shall be recognized unless, within one year of the date of the death of such parent (i) an affidavit by such child or by someone acting for such child alleging such parenthood has been filed in the clerk’s office of the circuit court of the jurisdiction wherein the property affected by such claim is located and (ii) an action seeking adjudication of parenthood is filed in an appropriate circuit court. The one-year limitation period runs notwithstanding the minority of such child; however, it does not apply in those cases where the relationship between the child born out of wedlock and the parent in question is established by (a) a birth record prepared upon information given by or at the request of such parent; (b) admission by such parent of parenthood before any court or in writing under oath; or (c) a previously entered judgment establishing such parent’s paternity by a court having jurisdiction to determine his paternity.

Unless otherwise specifically provided therein, an order terminating residual parental rights under § 16.1-283 terminates the rights of the parent to take from or through the child in question but the order does not otherwise affect the rights of the child, the child’s kindred, or the parent’s kindred to take from or through the parent or the rights of the parent’s kindred to take from or through the child.

History.

1978, c. 647, § 64.1-5.1; 1989, c. 466; 1994, c. 919; 1998, c. 603; 1999, c. 781; 2009, c. 449; 2012, c. 614.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provided that the amendment to former § 64.1-5.1 by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, would become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Law Review.

For survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 631 (2009).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3 Descent and Distribution. § 3.09 Children and Their Descendants. Cox.

§ 64.2-103.
Evidence of paternity.

For the purposes of this title, paternity of a child born out of wedlock shall be established by clear and convincing evidence, and such evidence may include the following:

That he cohabited openly with the mother during all of the 10 months immediately prior to the time the child was born;

That he gave consent to a physician or other person, not including the mother, charged with the responsibility of securing information for the preparation of a birth record that his name be used as the father of the child upon the birth record of the child;

That he allowed by a general course of conduct the common use of his surname by the child;

That he claimed the child as his child on any statement, tax return, or other document filed and signed by him with any local, state, or federal government or any agency thereof;

That he admitted before any court having jurisdiction to determine his paternity that he is the father of the child;

That he voluntarily admitted paternity in writing under oath;

The results of scientifically reliable genetic tests, including DNA tests, weighted with all the evidence; or

Other medical, scientific, or anthropological evidence relating to the alleged parentage of the child based on tests performed by experts.

A judgment establishing a father’s paternity made by a court having jurisdiction to determine his paternity is sufficient evidence of paternity for the purposes of this section.

History.

1978, c. 647, § 64.1-5.2; 1989, c. 466; 1991, c. 479; 1999, c. 781; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 631 (2009).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3 Descent and Distribution. § 3.09 Children and Their Descendants. Cox.

§ 64.2-104.
Incorporation by reference into a will, power of attorney, or trust instrument.

The following original documents may be incorporated by reference into a will, power of attorney, or trust instrument:

A letter or memorandum to the fiduciary or agent as to the interpretation of discretionary powers of distribution where the will, power of attorney, or trust instrument grants the fiduciary or agent the power to make distributions to beneficiaries in the discretion of the fiduciary or agent; and

A letter or memorandum stating the views or directions of the maker of the will, power of attorney, or trust instrument as to the exercise of discretion by the fiduciary or agent in making health care decisions for the maker.

No provision in the original document sought to be incorporated by reference under this section is enforceable if it contradicts or is inconsistent with a provision of the incorporating will, power of attorney, or trust instrument, including if it alters the possession or enjoyment of trust property or the income therefrom as directed in the trust instrument.

This section shall not prevent the incorporation by reference of any writing into any other writing that would otherwise be effective under §

64.2-400

or under any other law of incorporation by reference.

The maker shall sign and have notarized the documents referenced in subsection A and may prepare the documents before or after the execution of the will, power of attorney, or trust instrument.

History.

2001, c. 369, § 64.1-45.2; 2002, c. 119; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

For 2002 survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2002).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 13-717 Clause for Attorney’s Will — Digital Assets; No. 15-102 Simple Will Giving Entire Estate to One Beneficiary, et seq.; No. 15-207 Bequest or Devise to Minor, et seq.; No. 15-236 Incorporation by Reference of Letter of Instruction to Trustee, et seq.

§ 64.2-105.
Incorporation by reference of certain powers of fiduciaries into will or trust instrument.

For purposes of this section:“Environmental law” means any federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of the environment or human health.“Estate” includes all interests in the real or personal property of a decedent passing by will or by intestate succession.“Fiduciary” includes one or more individuals or corporations having trust powers, and includes the fiduciary of the estate of a decedent and the trustee of an inter vivos or testamentary trust. Any substitute, added, or successor fiduciary shall have all of the powers hereby provided for the fiduciary named in the will or trust instrument.“Hazardous substances” means any substances defined as hazardous or toxic or otherwise regulated by any environmental law.

The following powers, in addition to all other powers granted by law, may be incorporated in whole or in part in any will or trust instrument by reference to this section:

To keep and retain any or all investments and property, real, personal or mixed, including stock in the fiduciary, if the fiduciary is a corporation, in the same form as they are at the time the investments and property come into the custody of the fiduciary, regardless of the character of the investments and property, whether they are such as then would be authorized by law for investment by fiduciaries, or whether a disproportionately large part of the trust or estate remains invested in one or more types of property, for such time as the fiduciary deems best, and to dispose of such property by sale, exchange, or otherwise as and when such fiduciary deems advisable.

At the discretion of the fiduciary, to receive additions to the estate from any source, in cash or in kind, and to hold, administer, and distribute such additions as a part of and under the same terms and conditions as the estate then currently held.

To sell, assign, exchange, transfer and convey, or otherwise dispose of, any or all of the investments and property, real, personal or mixed, that are included in, or may at any time become part of the trust or estate upon such terms and conditions as the fiduciary, in his absolute discretion, deems advisable, at either public or private sale, either for cash or deferred payments or other consideration, as the fiduciary determines. For the purpose of selling, assigning, exchanging, transferring, or conveying such investments and property, the fiduciary has the power to make, execute, acknowledge, and deliver any and all instruments of conveyance, deeds of trust, or assignments in such form and with warranties and covenants as the fiduciary deems expedient and proper; and in the event of any sale, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition of any of the trust or estate, the purchaser shall not be obligated in any way to see to the application of the purchase money or other consideration passing in connection therewith.

To grant, sell, transfer, exchange, purchase, or acquire options of any kind on property held by such trust or estate or acquired or to be acquired by such trust or estate or held or owned by any other person.

To lease any or all of the real estate that is included in or may at any time become a part of the trust or estate upon such terms and conditions as the fiduciary in his sole judgment and discretion deems advisable. Any lease made by the fiduciary may extend beyond the term of the trust or administration of the estate and, for the purpose of leasing such real estate, the fiduciary has the power to make, execute, acknowledge, and deliver any and all instruments, in such form and with such covenants and warranties as the fiduciary deems expedient and proper.

To vote any stocks, bonds, or other securities held by the fiduciary at any meeting of stockholders, bondholders, or other security holders, and to delegate the power to so vote to attorneys-in-fact or proxies under power of attorney, restricted or unrestricted.

To borrow money for such periods of time and upon such terms and conditions as to rates, maturities, renewals, and security as to the fiduciary seems advisable, including the power to borrow from the fiduciary, if the fiduciary is a bank, for the purpose of paying (i) debts, taxes, or other charges against the trust or estate or any part thereof and (ii) with prior approval of the court for any proper purpose of the trust or estate. The fiduciary has the power to mortgage or pledge such portion of the trust or estate as may be required to secure such loans and, as maker or endorser, to renew existing loans.

To make loans or advancements to the executor or other representative of the grantor’s estate in case such executor or other representative is in need of cash with which to pay taxes, claims, or other indebtedness of the grantor’s estate; but no assets acquired from a qualified retirement benefit plan under § 2039(c) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be used to make such loans or advancements, and such assets shall be segregated and held separately until all claims against the estate for debts of the decedent or claims of administration have been satisfied. Such loans or advancements may be secured or unsecured, and the trustee is not liable in any way for any loss resulting to the trust or estate by reason of the exercise of this authority.

To compromise, adjust, arbitrate, sue on or defend, abandon, or otherwise deal with and settle claims in favor of or against the trust or estate as the fiduciary deems best, and his decision is conclusive.

To make distributions in cash or in kind or partly in each at valuations to be determined by the fiduciary, whose decision as to values shall be conclusive.

To repair, alter, improve, renovate, reconstruct, or demolish any of the buildings on the real estate held by the fiduciary and to construct such buildings and improvements thereon as the fiduciary in his discretion deems advisable.

To employ and compensate, out of the principal or income, or both as to the fiduciary seems proper, agents, accountants, brokers, attorneys-in-fact, attorneys-at-law, tax specialists, licensed real estate brokers, licensed salesmen, and other assistants and advisors deemed by the fiduciary to be needful for the proper administration of the trust or estate, and to do so without liability for any neglect, omission, misconduct, or default of any such agent or professional representative provided he was selected and retained with reasonable care.

To rely upon any affidavit, certificate, letter, notice, telegram, or other paper or upon any telephone conversation believed by the fiduciary to be genuine and upon any other evidence believed by the fiduciary to be sufficient, and to be protected and held harmless for all payments or distributions required to be made hereunder if made in good faith and without actual notice or knowledge of the changed condition or status of any person receiving payments or other distributions upon a condition.

To retain any interest held by the fiduciary in any business, whether as a stockholder or security holder of a corporation, a partner, a sole proprietor, or otherwise, for any length of time, without limitations, solely at the risk of the trust or estate and without liability on the part of the fiduciary for any losses resulting therefrom; including the power to (i) participate in the conduct of such business and take or delegate to others discretionary power to take any action with respect to its management and affairs that an individual could take as the owner of such business, including the voting of stock and the determination of any or all questions of policy; (ii) participate in any incorporation, reorganization, merger, consolidation, recapitalization, or liquidation of the business; (iii) invest additional capital in, subscribe to additional stock or securities of, and loan money or credit with or without security to, such business out of the trust or estate property; (iv) elect or employ as directors, officers, employees, or agents of such business, and compensate, any persons, including the fiduciary or a director, officer, or agent of the fiduciary; (v) accept as correct financial or other statements rendered by the business from time to time as to its conditions and operations except when having actual notice to the contrary; (vi) regard the business as an entity separate from the trust or estate with no duty to account to any court as to its operations; (vii) deal with and act for the business in any capacity, including any banking or trust capacity and the loaning of money out of the fiduciary’s own funds, and to be compensated therefor; and (viii) sell or liquidate such interest or any part thereof at any time. If any business shall be unincorporated, contractual and tort liabilities arising out of such business shall be satisfied, first, out of the business, and second, out of the trust or estate; but in no event shall there be a liability of the fiduciary, and if the fiduciary is held liable, the fiduciary is entitled to indemnification from, first, the business, and second, the trust or estate. The fiduciary is entitled to such additional compensation as is commensurate with the time, effort, and responsibility involved in his performance of services with respect to such business. Such compensation for services rendered to the business may be paid by the fiduciary from the business or from other assets or from both as the fiduciary, in his discretion, determines to be advisable; however, the amount of such additional compensation is subject to the final approval of the court.

To do all other acts and things not inconsistent with the provisions of the will or trust in which these powers are incorporated that the fiduciary deems necessary or desirable for the proper management of the trusts herein created, in the same manner and to the same extent as an individual could do with respect to his own property.

To hold property in the fiduciary’s name or in the name of nominees.

During the minority, incapacity, or the disability of any beneficiary, and in the sole discretion of the fiduciary, to distribute income and principal to the beneficiary in any of the following ways: (i) directly to the beneficiary; (ii) to a relative, friend, guardian, conservator, or committee, to be expended by such person for the education, maintenance, support, or benefit of the beneficiary; (iii) by the fiduciary expending the same for the education, maintenance, support, or benefit of the beneficiary; (iv) to an adult person or bank authorized to exercise trust powers as custodian for a minor beneficiary under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (§

64.2-1900

et seq.) to be held by such custodian under the terms of such act; or (v) to an adult person or bank authorized to exercise trust powers as custodial trustee for a beneficiary who is incapacitated as defined in §

64.2-900

, under the Uniform Custodial Trust Act (§

64.2-900

et seq.) to be held as custodial trustee under the terms of such act.

To continue and carry on any farming operation transferred to the fiduciary and to operate such farms and any other farm which may be acquired, including the power to (i) operate the farm with hired labor, tenants, or sharecroppers; (ii) hire a farm manager or a professional farm management service to supervise the farming operations; (iii) lease or rent the farm for cash or for a share of the crops; (iv) purchase or otherwise acquire farm machinery, equipment, and livestock; (v) construct, repair, and improve farm buildings of all sorts necessary, in the fiduciary’s judgment, for the operation of the farm; (vi) make loans or advances or to obtain loans or advances from any source, including the fiduciary at the prevailing rate of interest for farm purposes including for production, harvesting, or marketing, for the construction, repair, or improvement of farm buildings, or for the purchase of farm machinery, equipment, or livestock; (vii) employ approved soil conservation practices in order to conserve, improve, and maintain the fertility and productivity of the soil; (viii) protect, manage, and improve the timber and forest on the farm and sell the timber and forest products when it is to the best interest of the estate or trust; (ix) ditch and drain damp or wet fields and areas of the farm when needed; (x) engage in livestock production, if it is deemed advisable, and to construct such fences and buildings and plant such pastures and crops as may be necessary to carry on a livestock program; (xi) execute contracts, notes, and chattel mortgages relating to agriculture with the Commodity Credit Corporation, the United States Secretary of Agriculture, or any other officer or agency of the federal or state government, to enter into acreage reduction agreements, to make soil conservation commitments, and to do all acts necessary to cooperate with any governmental agricultural program; and (xii) in general, employ the methods of carrying on the farming operation that are in common use by the community in which the farm is located. As the duties that the fiduciary is requested to assume with respect to farming operations may considerably enlarge and increase the fiduciary’s usual responsibility and work as fiduciary, the fiduciary is entitled to such additional reasonable compensation as is commensurate with the time, effort, and responsibility involved in his performance of such services.

To purchase and hold life insurance policies on the life of any beneficiary, or any person in whom the beneficiary has an insurable interest, and pay the premiums thereon out of income or principal as the fiduciary deems appropriate; provided, however, that the decision of the beneficiary of any trust otherwise meeting the requirements of § 2056(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, shall control in respect to the purchase or holding of a life insurance policy by the trustee of such trust.

To make any election, including any election permitted by statutes enacted after the date of execution of the will or trust instrument, authorized under any law requiring, or relating to the requirement for, payment of any taxes or assessments on assets or income of the estate or in connection with any fiduciary capacity, regardless of whether any property or income is received by or is under the control of the fiduciary, including, elections concerning the timing of payment of any such tax or assessment, the valuation of any property subject to any such tax or assessment, and the alternative use of items of deduction in computing any tax or assessment.

To comply with environmental law:

To inspect property held by the fiduciary, including interests in sole proprietorships, partnerships, or corporations and any assets owned by any such business enterprise, for the purpose of determining compliance with environmental law affecting such property and to respond to a change in, or any actual or threatened violation of, any environmental law affecting property held by the fiduciary;

To take, on behalf of the estate or trust, any action necessary to respond to a change in, or prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy any actual or threatened violation of, any environmental law affecting property held by the fiduciary, either before or after the initiation of an enforcement action by any governmental body;

To refuse to accept property in trust if the fiduciary determines that any property to be transferred to the trust either is contaminated by any hazardous substance or is being used or has been used for any activity directly or indirectly involving any hazardous substance which could result in liability to the trust or otherwise impair the value of the assets held therein;

To disclaim any power granted by any document, statute, or rule of law that, in the sole discretion of the fiduciary, may cause the fiduciary to incur personal liability under any environmental law; and

To charge the cost of any inspection, review, abatement, response, cleanup, or remedial action authorized herein against the income or principal of the trust or estate.

For the purposes of this section, unless the will or trust instrument expresses a contrary intention, the incorporation by reference of powers enumerated by this statute shall refer to those powers existing at the time of death and reference to powers under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act in an instrument executed prior to July 1, 1989, shall be construed to refer to the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (§

64.2-1900

et seq.).

This section shall not be construed to affect the application of the standard of judgment and care as set forth in the Uniform Prudent Investor Act (§

64.2-780

et seq.).

In the event that the will or trust instrument contains a provision in favor of a surviving spouse of the testator or grantor, the powers enumerated in this section shall not be construed or interpreted to cause the bequest to fail to qualify for the marital deduction permitted under the federal estate tax law, unless the will or trust instrument shall specifically provide to the contrary. A fiduciary acting under a construction or interpretation of a power, where such action is otherwise reasonable under the circumstances, shall incur no responsibility for acts taken in good faith that are otherwise thereafter contended to cause disqualification for the marital deduction. This subsection applies without regard to when the will or trust was executed or probated or when the testator died in relation to the effective date of this section or amendments thereto.

22.

To resign as fiduciary if the fiduciary reasonably believes that there is or may be a conflict of interest between him in his fiduciary capacity and in his individual capacity because of potential claims or liabilities which may be asserted against him on behalf of the trust or estate because of the type or condition of assets held therein.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-57.2; 1966, c. 425; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-57; 1970, cc. 65, 296; 1972, c. 788; 1973, c. 94; 1974, c. 659; 1976, c. 419; 1982, cc. 525, 549, 551; 1989, c. 736; 1990, c. 782; 1992, c. 584; 1994, c. 476; 1997, c. 801; 1999, cc. 772, 975; 2003, cc. 30, 42, 253; 2012, c. 614.

Editor’s note.

26 U.S.C. § 2039(c), referred to in subdivision B 8 above, was repealed in 1986 by P.L. 99-514.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts and estates for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1559 (1970).

for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1363 (1972).

for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1621 (1973).

for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1632 (1974).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1497 (1976).

for the year 1979-1980, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 369 (1981).

for the year 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 859 (1989).

For article on the Uniform Custodial Trust Act, see 24 U. Rich. L. Rev. 65 (1989).

For a review of wills, trusts, and estates law in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1075 (1999).

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

For survey article on the law pertaining to wills, trusts, and estates, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 267 (2003).

For survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 631 (2009).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 25 Personal Representatives; Rights and Duties.
§ 25.01 Introductory, et seq. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 13-715 Clause for Attorney’s Will Incorporating Agreement Regarding Law Practice; No. 15-102 Simple Will Giving Entire Estate to One Beneficiary, et seq.; No. 15-207 Bequest or Devise to Minor, et seq.; No. 15-301 Revocable Inter Vivos Trust Agreement, et seq.; No. 15-470 Order Granting Fiduciary Powers Pursuant to Va. Code Ann. §

64.2-106

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 60.

§ 64.2-106.
Grant of certain powers to personal representative or trustee by circuit court.

Upon the motion of a personal representative or trustee, a circuit court may grant to the personal representative or trustee all or a part of the powers that may be incorporated by reference pursuant to §

64.2-105

. If there is more than one personal representative or trustee, the court may specify as to whether the consent of all personal representatives or trustees or a majority thereof shall be required to act, and in absence of such specification, the consent of all such personal representatives or trustees to act shall be required.

Such motion shall be filed in the circuit court in which the personal representative or trustee qualified, or if there was no qualification, the circuit court for the jurisdiction in which the grantor resides or resided at the time of his death, a trustee resides, or a corporate trustee has an office. Such motion may be ex parte; however, the court, in its discretion, may require such notice to and the convening of interested parties as it may deem proper in each case. Notwithstanding the granting of or the failure to grant such powers, the court shall have continuing jurisdiction to confer powers in addition to those previously granted or to revoke any or all such powers previously granted by the court. Such additional grant or revocation may also be ex parte.

The court may, in granting or withholding such powers, consider (i) whether the personal representative or trustee was nominated by the decedent, the grantor, or the beneficiaries; (ii) the number and capacity of the beneficiaries and their ability or inability to consent to the acts of the personal representative or trustee which are otherwise within the scope of §

64.2-105

; (iii) the relationship of the personal representative or trustee to the beneficiaries; (iv) the character of the estate to be administered, including any real estate which would be within the scope of the powers granted by the provisions of §

64.2-106

; and (v) the capacity of the personal representative or trustee to perform under the powers conferred and to answer for any acts for which he might be held accountable under his bond.The court, in its discretion, may attach further conditions to such grant of power in any manner which it shall deem necessary and proper.

In no case shall a court grant any powers, if the grant of such powers would be contrary to the intention of the testator or grantor as implied from or as expressed in the will or trust instrument, or would otherwise be inconsistent with the disposition made in the will or trust instrument.

History.

1976, c. 437, § 64.1-57.1; 1985, c. 345; 1988, c. 345; 1999, c. 995; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on trusts and estates for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1497 (1976).

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

For survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 631 (2009).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 25 Personal Representatives; Rights and Duties.
§ 25.01 Introductory, et seq. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-470 Order Granting Fiduciary Powers Pursuant to Va. Code Ann. §

64.2-106

.

§ 64.2-107.
Power granted to personal representatives to make election regarding marital deduction as to certain qualifying terminable interest property; binding effect of election.

For purposes of this section, “personal representative” includes the trustee of a qualified terminable interest property trust if there has been no qualification of a personal representative for the estate of the decedent who created the trust.

Personal representatives, whether heretofore or hereafter qualified, are hereby granted the power to make the election on the return of their decedents as required pursuant to § 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, to obtain the marital deduction for bequests or devises of qualifying terminable interest property in favor of the surviving spouse created under a will or inter vivos trust of the decedent.

If the personal representative determines in good faith to make or not to make such an election and does not act imprudently in making such decision, the decision shall be final and binding upon all of the beneficiaries of the estate.

History.

1982, c. 551, § 64.1-57.2; 1983, c. 54; 1999, c. 197; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-108.
Power granted to personal representatives and trustees to donate conservation or open-space easements.

Personal representatives and trustees, whether heretofore or hereafter qualified or appointed, are hereby granted the power to donate a conservation easement as provided in the Virginia Conservation Easement Act (§ 10.1-1009 et seq.) or an open-space easement as provided in the Open-Space Land Act (§ 10.1-1700 et seq.) on any real property of their decedents and settlors, in order to obtain the benefit of the estate tax exclusion allowed under § 2031(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, provided they have the written consent of all of the heirs, beneficiaries, and devisees whose interests are affected thereby. Upon petition of the personal representative or trustee, the circuit court may give consent on behalf of any unborn, unascertained, or incapacitated heirs, beneficiaries, or devisees whose interests are affected thereby after determining that (i) the donation of the conservation easement will not adversely affect such heirs, beneficiaries, or devisees or (ii) it is more likely than not that such heirs, beneficiaries, or devisees would consent if they were before the court and capable of giving consent. A guardian ad litem shall be appointed to represent the interests of any unborn, unascertained, or incapacitated persons.

History.

1999, cc. 503, 527, § 64.1-57.3; 2009, c. 588; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 631 (2009).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-576 Deed of Gift of Conservation Easement, et seq.; No. 16-6030 Certificate of Trust.

§ 64.2-108.1.
References to former sections, articles, or chapters.

When any will, trust instrument, power of attorney, or other instrument refers to a section of the Code that, at the time the reference was made in the will, trust instrument, power of attorney, or other instrument, had been repealed and transferred in the same or a modified form to a new section, article, or chapter in Title 64.2, the reference shall be construed to refer to the latter in the absence of any intent to the contrary.

History.

2013, c. 89.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2013 act having been §

64.2-109

.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, see “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 189 (2013).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 16 Construction of the Will.
§ 16.07 The Law Applicable; Chapter 25 Personal Representatives; Rights and Duties.
§ 25.03 Powers of Personal Representatives — Incorporation by Reference. Cox.

§ 64.2-108.2.
Provision in certain trust void.

For purposes of this section, “medical assistance” and “medical assistance benefits” mean benefits payable under the state plan for medical assistance services.

Except as provided in subsection C, a provision in any inter vivos trust created for the benefit of the grantor that provides directly or indirectly for the suspension, termination, or diversion of the principal, income, or other beneficial interest of the grantor in the event that he should apply for medical assistance or require medical, hospital, or nursing care or long-term custodial, nursing, or medical care shall be against public policy and ineffective as against the Commonwealth. The assets of the trust, both principal and interest, shall be distributed as though no such application had been made. The provisions of this subsection shall apply without regard to the irrevocability of the trust or the purpose for which the trust was created.

Subsection B shall not apply to any trust with a corpus of $25,000 or less. If the corpus of any such trust exceeds $25,000, $25,000 of the trust shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection B. However, if the grantor has created more than one trust as described in subsection B, the $25,000 exemption shall be prorated among the trusts. Further, if the grantor made uncompensated transfers, as defined in §

20-88.02

, within 30 months of applying for Medicaid benefits and no payments were ordered pursuant to subsection D of §

20-88.02

, the $25,000 exemption under this subsection shall not apply.

The exemption provided by subsection C shall not apply to any trust created on or after August 11, 1993.

To the extent any trust created between August 11, 1993, and July 1, 1994 would but for subsection D be entitled to the exemption provided by subsection C, the grantor may revoke such trust notwithstanding any irrevocability in the terms of such trust. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to authorize the grantor to effect the vested rights of any beneficiary of such trust without the express written consent of such beneficiary.

The provisions of subsection B shall not apply to an irrevocable inter vivos trust to the extent it is created for the purpose of paying the grantor’s funeral and burial expenses and is funded in an amount and manner allowable as a resource in determining eligibility for medical assistance benefits. In the event any amount remains in the trust upon payment of the funeral or burial arrangements provided to or on behalf of such individual, the Commonwealth shall receive all amounts remaining in such trust up to an amount equal to the total medical assistance paid on behalf of the individual.

History.

1993, c. 701, § 55-19.5; 1994, c. 692; 1998, c. 735; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, recodified former Title 55 as Title 55.1. As part of the recodification, former § 55-19.5 was relocated to Title 64.2 as this section.

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2019.”